lang_data/bpy-Qaaa-x-BIPA/bpy-Qaaa-x-BIPA.lexd
PATTERNS
Adjective
Noun
misc
Adverb
Classifier
Pronoun
Verb

LEXICON Adjective


LEXICON Noun


LEXICON misc
<misc>:hatgo
<misc>:ɟepej
<misc>:babrue
<misc>:opej
<misc>:anloga
<misc>:na


LEXICON Adverb


LEXICON Classifier


LEXICON Pronoun


LEXICON Verb
